District of Columbia statutes.
29-926

Transfer of shares and memberships; withdrawal.

(a)

If a member desires to withdraw from the association or dispose of any or all of the member’s holdings therein, the directors may purchase the holdings by paying the member the par value of any or all the holdings offered. The directors shall then reissue or cancel the holdings. A vote of the majority of the members voting at a regular or special meeting may order the directors to exercise this power to purchase.

(b)

If the association fails, within 60 days of the original offer, to purchase all or any part of the holdings offered, the member may dispose of the unpurchased interest elsewhere, subject to the approval of the transferee by a majority vote of the directors. Any purported transferee not approved by the directors may appeal to the members at their first regular or special meeting thereafter and the action of the meeting shall be final. If the transferee is not approved, the directors shall exercise their power to purchase, if and when the purchase can be made without jeopardizing the solvency of the association.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-926.
1981 Ed., § 29-1126.
1973 Ed., § 29-826.